District of Columbia statutes.
42-2435

Criminal penalties.

(a)

Any person who knowingly violates any provision of this chapter, or any rule promulgated pursuant to this chapter, shall be fined an amount not to exceed $10,000, imprisoned for not more than one year, or both. All prosecutions of this subsection shall be instituted by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia or any of his or her assistants.

(b)

A person who knowingly commits a 2nd or subsequent violation of any provision of this chapter, or any rule promulgated pursuant to this chapter, shall be fined an amount not to exceed $50,000, imprisoned for not more than 5 years, or both.

History

Jan. 29, 2008, D.C. Law 17-87, § 6, 54 DCR 11913